Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.030

Meetings declared open and public.

(1) All meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be open and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the governing body of a public agency, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(2) Public agencies are encouraged to provide for the increased ability of the public to observe and participate in the meetings of governing bodies through real-time telephonic, electronic, internet, or other readily available means of remote access that do not require an additional cost to access the meeting.

[ 2022 c 115 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 115: See note following RCW 42.30.230.